South Dakota, session 2026, HB1173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 49-41B-12 be AMENDED:
49-41B-12. At the time of filing an application as required in § 49-41B-11, an
applicant must deposit the minimum fee with the commission. If required by the
commission, an applicant must remit an amount to be determined by the commission
based upon the actual cost of investigating, reviewing, processing, and serving notice of
an application. The amount must be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to a
subfund within the designated revenue regulatory assessment fee fund and may only be
disbursed on vouchers approved by the commission for the actual cost of investigating,
reviewing, processing, and serving notice of the application. Except as otherwise agreed
to by an applicant, the maximum fee chargeable may not exceed one-quarter of one
percent of the first one hundred million dollars of estimated construction cost plus one-
twentieth of one percent of all additional estimated construction costs of the facility. To
exceed the maximum fee when the applicant has not agreed to a fee higher than the
maximum amount, the commission must make a finding upon a motion from the
commission staff that all costs incurred were reasonably necessary to investigate, review,
process, and serve notice of the application. The minimum total fee chargeable may not
be less than twenty thousand dollars. The minimum fee is nonrefundable unless ordered
by the commission.
Moneys from the South Dakota public utilities commission gross receipts tax fund,
as established in § 49-1A-2, may not be used to reimburse the commission for any
additional costs incurred.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.725.15 2 1173
If the commission determines that an environmental impact statement should be
prepared as provided under chapter 34A-9 before taking final action on an application
under this chapter, the maximum fee chargeable above may be increased to an amount
not to exceed one-half of one percent of the first one hundred million dollars of estimated
construction cost plus one-twentieth of one percent of all additional estimated construction
costs of the facility. However, the provisions of this paragraph do not apply in cases in
which a detailed environment impact study has been completed pursuant to the
requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 as amended to January 1,
2009, and implementing regulations thereto if such a statement is available to the
commission at least thirty days prior to the time the commission is required to render a
decision under § 49-41B-24 or 49-41B-25.
The provisions of this section apply to all pending permit applications and future
permit applications before the commission.
Section 2. That § 49-41B-21 be AMENDED:
49-41B-21. Prior to the issuance of a permit, the commission may prepare or
require the preparation of an environmental impact statement that complies with the
provisions of chapter 34A-9.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, an applicant seeking a permit under
this chapter for a carbon dioxide transmission facility, as described in § 49-41B-2.1, shall
prepare an environmental impact statement. In all other cases, the commission may
require an applicant to prepare an environmental impact statement.
The environmental impact statement must:
(1) Be paid for by the applicant;
(2) Include the contents required in subdivisions 34A-9-7(1) to (7), inclusive;
(3) Be submitted to the commission at least thirty days prior to the time the
commission is required to render a decision pursuant § 49-41B-24 or 49-41B-25;
and
(4) Be published on the commission website.
The commission may not require an environmental impact statement if a detailed
environmental impact study complying with the requirements of the National
Environmental Policy Act of 1969, 42 U.S.C. § 4321 (January 1, 2026), has been
completed and made available to the commission at least thirty days prior to the time the
commission is required to render a decision under § 49-41B-24 or 49-41B-25.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.725.15 3 1173
Section 3. That § 49-41B-22.1 be AMENDED:
49-41B-22.1. Nothing contained herein shall prohibit an An applicant from
reapplying may reapply for a permit previously denied pursuant to § 49-41B-24 or 49-
41B-25 within three years from the date of the denial of the original permit. Upon Except
as otherwise provided, upon the first such reapplication, the applicant shall have has the
burden of proof to establish only those criteria upon which the original permit was denied,
provided that nothing in the reapplication materially changes the information presented
in the original application regarding those criteria upon which the original permit was not
denied. However, nothing contained in this provision shall prohibit the Public Utilities
Commission from requiring such. The commission may require the applicant to meet its
the burden of proof as to any other criteria, upon a specific finding by the commission of
a material change in the circumstances regarding those criteria, but the Public Utilities
Commission shall commission may not, in any event, prepare or require the preparation
of an additional environmental impact statement.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.